Utah statutes.
10-8-91.   Levy of tax by cities of the third, fourth, and fifth class and
towns.
A city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or a town may levy a tax not
exceeding .001 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property for the
purposes stated in Section 10-8-90.
